North Dakota, session 69, HB1173.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 24-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Specialist Dennis "DJ" Ferderer Jr. Iraq bridge - State highway 31 - Continuing
appropriation.
The department shall designate the bridge on state highway 31 north of New Salem between the
junction of thirty - third street and the junction of thirty - second street as the Specialist Dennis "DJ"
Ferderer Jr. Iraq bridge and shall place signs along the highway designating that name. The department
may accept any appropriate signs or funds donated to the department for the placement of signs. Any
donated funds are appropriated to the department on a continuing basis for the purpose of providing
signs designating the bridge on state highway 31 as the Specialist Dennis "DJ" Ferderer Jr. Iraq bridge.

H. B. NO. 1173 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1173.
House Vote: Yeas 87 Nays 0 Absent 7
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State